public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.old.verb.rules.aff
# vèrbi -ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0
SFX e1 Y 67
SFX e1 io i/P1 io
SFX e1 io e-lo/A1 io
SFX e1 io elo/A1 io
SFX e1 ir aralo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir arave-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir arà-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir aràe-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir aràelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir aràvelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir aremo/P1 ir
SFX e1 ir arémolo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir arémomelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir aríe-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir aríelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir aríselo/I8 ir
SFX e1 ir elo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eralo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir erave-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir erà-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eràe-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eràelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eràvelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eremo/P1 ir
SFX e1 ir erémolo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir erémomelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir eríe-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eríelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir eríselo/I8 ir
SFX e1 ir es ir
SFX e1 ir est ir
SFX e1 ir eve-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir é-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir ée-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir éelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir éndolo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir éndomelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir éntolo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir éntomelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir évelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir í-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir íe-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir íelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir índolo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir índomelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir íntolo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir íntomelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir ívelo/A1 ir
SFX e1 ir onme/P7 ir
SFX e1 ir ónmelo/P7 ir
SFX e1 o a/P1 o
SFX e1 o e/P1 [^lr]o
SFX e1 o e/P1 [aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e1 o e/P1 [^aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e1 o i/P1 [^i]o
SFX e1 o e-lo/A1 [^i]o
SFX e1 o elo/A1 [^i]o
SFX e1 r lo/P7 ir
SFX e1 r mo/P1 ir
SFX e1 r ve-lo/A1 ir
SFX e1 r onme/P7 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e1 r ónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e1 r s ir

# vèrbi -ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2P0P1P2I0
SFX e2 Y 62
SFX e2 io i/P2 io
SFX e2 io e-ƚo/A1 io
SFX e2 io eƚo/A1 io
SFX e2 ir arave-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir araƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir arà-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir aràe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir aràeƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir aràveƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir aremo/P2 ir
SFX e2 ir arémomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir arémoƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir aríe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir aríeƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir aríseƚo/I9 ir
SFX e2 ir erave-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eraƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir erà-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eràe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eràeƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eràveƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eremo/P2 ir
SFX e2 ir erémomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir erémoƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir eríe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eríeƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eríseƚo/I9 ir
SFX e2 ir eve-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir eƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir é-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir ée-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir éeƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir éndomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir éndoƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir éntomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir éntoƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir éveƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir í-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir íe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir íeƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir índomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir índoƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir íntomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir íntoƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 ir íveƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 ir ónmeƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 o a/P2 o
SFX e2 o e/P2 [^lr]o
SFX e2 o e/P2 [aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e2 o e/P2 [^aeiouàèéíòóú][lr]o
SFX e2 o i/P2 [^i]o
SFX e2 o e-ƚo/A1 [^i]o
SFX e2 o eƚo/A1 [^i]o
SFX e2 r ve-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX e2 r ónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e2 r ƚo/P8 ir
SFX e2 r mo/P2 ir


# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/f0f1f2P0P1P2I0
SFX f0 Y 236
SFX f0 0 me/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir a/P0 ir
SFX f0 ir arane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir aratu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir arave/P3 ir	
SFX f0 ir aremo/P0I0 ir
SFX f0 ir aren/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir arense ir
SFX f0 ir arensi ir
SFX f0 ir aresi/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir aresiu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir arion/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arione/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir arionse ir
SFX f0 ir arisen/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arisene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir arisense ir
SFX f0 ir arisensi ir
SFX f0 ir arisi/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir arision/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arisione/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir arisionse ir
SFX f0 ir arisiu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir arisié/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir arisiéu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir arison/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arisone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir arisonse ir
SFX f0 ir arié/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir ariéu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir aron/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir aronse ir
SFX f0 ir arà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir aràe/P3 ir	
SFX f0 ir aràvene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir arè/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arène/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir aré/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir arémoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir arémome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir arémomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir arésimo/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir arésimoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir arésitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir aréu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir aría/I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir arèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir aríane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir aríatu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir aríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir aríene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir arísitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir arò/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir aròe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir e/P0P3I0 ir
SFX f0 ir ede/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir ege/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir erane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir eratu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir erave/P3 ir	
SFX f0 ir eremo/P0I0 ir
SFX f0 ir eren/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir erense ir
SFX f0 ir erensi ir
SFX f0 ir eresi/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir eresiu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir erion/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erione/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir erionse ir
SFX f0 ir erisen/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erisene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir erisense ir
SFX f0 ir erisensi ir
SFX f0 ir erisi/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir erision/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erisione/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir erisionse ir
SFX f0 ir erisiu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir erisié/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir erisiéu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir erison/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erisone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir erisonse ir
SFX f0 ir erié/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir eriéu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir eron/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir eronse ir
SFX f0 ir erà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir eràe/P3 ir	
SFX f0 ir eràvene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir erè/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erène/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir eré/I4 ir
SFX f0 ir erémoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir erémome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir erémomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir erésimo/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir erésimoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir erésitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir eréu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir ería/I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir erèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir eríane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir eríatu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir eríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX f0 ir eríene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir erísitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir erò/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir eròe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir i/P0P3I2 ir
SFX f0 ir o/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir onme/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir éa/P3I0I4 ir
SFX f0 ir éane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir éau/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir ée/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir éene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir éi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX f0 ir éimo/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir éimoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir éitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir éndome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir éndomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir éntome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir éntomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir éo/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir éone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir ésimo ir
SFX f0 ir éu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir évane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir évau/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir évene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir évimoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir évitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir évone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir í/P3I4 ir
SFX f0 ir ía/P3I0I2I4 ir
SFX f0 ir èe/P3I0I2I4 ir
SFX f0 ir íane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir íau/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir íe/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir íene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir íi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX f0 ir íimo/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir íimoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir íitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir ímoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir índome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir índomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir íntome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir íntomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir ío/I0 ir
SFX f0 ir íone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir ísene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir ísime/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir ísimene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir ísimo ir
SFX f0 ir ísitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir ísome/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir ísomene/P6 ir
SFX f0 ir ísone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir íu/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir ívane/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir ívau/I5 ir
SFX f0 ir ívene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir ívimoe/I1 ir
SFX f0 ir ívitu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 ir ívone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 ir ónmene/P6 ir
SFX f0 r me/P6 ir
SFX f0 r mo/I0 ir
SFX f0 r onme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX f0 r sa/P0 ir
SFX f0 r sede/I4 ir
SFX f0 r sege/I4 ir
SFX f0 r so/P0I0 ir
SFX f0 r sé/I4 ir
SFX f0 r séu/I5 ir
SFX f0 r tu/I3 ir	
SFX f0 r vene/I1 ir	
SFX f0 r vione/I1 ir	
SFX f0 r viéu/I5 ir
SFX f0 r vone/I1 ir	
SFX f0 r éu/I5 ir
SFX f0 r ónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir

# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/f0f1f2P0P1P2I0
SFX f1 Y 67
SFX f1 0 lo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir a/P1 ir
SFX f1 ir aralo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir arave-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir arà-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir aràe-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir aràelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir aràvelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir aremo/P1 ir
SFX f1 ir arémolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir arémomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir aríe-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir aríelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir aríselo/I8 ir
SFX f1 ir e/P1 ir
SFX f1 ir elo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir eralo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir erave-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir erà-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir eràe-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir eràelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir eràvelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir erémolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir erémomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir eríe-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir eríelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir eríselo/I8 ir
SFX f1 ir eve-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir é-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir ée-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir éelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir éndolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir éndomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir éntolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir éntomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir eremo/P1 ir
SFX f1 ir es ir
SFX f1 ir est ir
SFX f1 ir évelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir i/P1 ir
SFX f1 ir í-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir íe-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir íelo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir índolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir índomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir íntolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir íntomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir íselo/A1 ir
SFX f1 ir ísilo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir ísimelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir ísolo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir ísomelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir onme/P7 ir
SFX f1 ir ónmelo/P7 ir
SFX f1 r lo/P7 ir
SFX f1 r onme/P7 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX f1 r sa/P1 ir
SFX f1 r se-lo/A1 ir
SFX f1 r so/P1 ir
SFX f1 r ónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]ir

# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/f0f1f2P0P1P2I0
SFX f2 Y 62
SFX f2 ir a/P2 ir
SFX f2 ir arave-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir araƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir arà-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir aràe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir aràeƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir aràveƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir aremo/P2 ir
SFX f2 ir arémomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir arémoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir aríe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir aríeƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir aríseƚo/I9 ir
SFX f2 ir erave-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir eraƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir erà-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir eràe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir eràeƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir eràveƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir erémomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir erémoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir eríe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir eríeƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir eríseƚo/I9 ir
SFX f2 ir eve-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir e/P2 ir
SFX f2 ir eƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir é-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir ée-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir éeƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir éndomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir éndoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir éntomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir éntoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir eremo/P2 ir
SFX f2 ir éveƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir i/P2 ir
SFX f2 ir í-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir íe-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir íeƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir índomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir índoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir íntomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir íntoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir íseƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 ir ísimeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir ísiƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir ísomeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir ísoƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 ir ónmeƚo/P8 ir
SFX f2 r sa/P2 ir
SFX f2 r se-ƚo/A1 ir
SFX f2 r so/P2 ir
SFX f2 r ónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX f2 r ƚo/P8 ir
